en: Steam Table Accessories
xx: Steam Table Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro chafingy
da: Tilbehør til varmebord
de: Zubehör für Warmhaltetheken
es: Accesorios para mesas de vapor
fr: Accessoires pour tables chaudes
it: Accessori per scaldavivande a vapore
ja: ウォーマーテーブル関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor warmhoudtafels
no: Tilbehør til varmeri/vannbad
pl: Akcesoria do bemarów
pt: Acessórios para mesa térmica
ru: Принадлежности для мармитов
sv: Kokeritillbehör
tr: Benmari Servis Masası Aksesuarları

en: Steam Table Pan Covers
xx: Steam Table Pan Covers
cs: Víka pro chafingy
da: Cover til varmebordspande
de: Deckel für Warmhaltebehälter
es: Tapas de cubetas para mesas de vapor
fr: Couvercles de bacs pour tables chaudes
it: Coperchi per vaschette per scaldavivande a vapore
ja: ウォーマーテーブルパン用フタ
nl: Deksels voor warmhoudschalen
no: Lokk til varmeri/vannbad
pl: Pokrywki do bemarów
pt: Tampas para panelas de mesa térmica
ru: Крышки для сковород мармитов
sv: Lock för kokeribehållare
tr: Benmari Servis Masası Tepsi Kapakları

en: Steam Table Pans
xx: Steam Table Pans
cs: Vkládací nádoby pro chafingy
da: Varmebordspander
de: Behälter für Warmhaltetheken
es: Cubetas para mesas de vapor
fr: Bacs pour tables chaudes
it: Vaschette per scaldavivande a vapore
ja: ウォーマーテーブルパン
nl: Warmhoudschalen
no: Fat til varmeri/vannbad
pl: Pojemniki do bemarów
pt: Panelas para mesa térmica
ru: Сковороды для мармитов
sv: Kokeribehållare
tr: Benmari Servis Masası Tepsileri

en: Toaster Accessories
xx: Toaster Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k toustovačům a topinkovačům
da: Tilbehør til brødristere
de: Toasterzubehör
es: Accesorios para tostadoras
fr: Accessoires pour grille-pains
it: Accessori per tostapane
ja: トースター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor broodroosters
no: Tilbehør til brødristere
pl: Akcesoria do tosterów
pt: Acessórios para torradeira
ru: Принадлежности для тостеров
sv: Brödrosttillbehör
tr: Ekmek Kızartma Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Vacuum Sealer Accessories
xx: Vacuum Sealer Accessories
cs: Vakuové baličky – příslušenství
da: Vakuumforsegler – tilbehør
de: Vakuumiererzubehör
es: Accesorios de envasado al vacío
fr: Accessoires d'emballage sous vide
it: Accessori sacchetti sottovuoto
ja: 真空パック器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vacuümapparaten
no: Tilbehør til vakuumforseglere
pl: Akcesoria do pakowarek próżniowych
pt: Acessórios para seladora a vácuo
ru: Принадлежности для вакуумной упаковки
sv: Tillbehör till vakuumförseglare
tr: Vakumlu Saklama Aksesuarları

en: Vacuum Sealer Bags
xx: Vacuum Sealer Bags
cs: Vakuové balicí pytlíky
da: Vakuumforsegler – poser
de: Vakuumierer-Beutel
es: Bolsas de envasado al vacío
fr: Sacs d'emballage sous vide
it: Sacchetti sottovuoto
ja: 真空パック器用袋
nl: Vacuümzakken
no: Poser til vakuumforseglere
pl: Worki do pakowarek próżniowych
pt: Sacos para seladora a vácuo
ru: Вакуумная упаковка
sv: Påsar till vakuumförseglare
tr: Vakumlu Saklama Poşetleri

en: Waffle Iron Accessories
xx: Waffle Iron Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro vaflovače
da: Tilbehør til vaffeljern
de: Zubehör für Waffeleisen
es: Accesorios de sartenes para gofres
fr: Accessoires pour gaufriers
it: Accessori per crepiere
ja: ワッフル焼き器用品
nl: Accessoires voor wafelijzers
no: Tilbehør til vaffeljern
pl: Akcesoria do maszynek do gofrów
pt: Acessórios para máquina de waffle
ru: Принадлежности для вафельниц
sv: Tillbehör för våffeljärn
tr: Gözleme Izgarası Aksesuarları

en: Water Cooler Accessories
xx: Water Cooler Accessories
cs: Chladiče vody – příslušenství
da: Vandkøler – tilbehør
de: Wasserspenderzubehör
es: Accesorios para refrigeradores de agua
fr: Accessoires pour fontaines à eau
it: Accessori per dispenser d'acqua fredda
ja: ウォータークーラー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor waterkoelers
no: Tilbehør til vannkjølere
pl: Akcesoria do dystrybutorów wody
pt: Acessórios para bebedouros
ru: Принадлежности для кулеров для воды
sv: Tillbehör till vattenkylare
tr: Su Soğutucu Aksesuarları

en: Water Cooler Bottles
xx: Water Cooler Bottles
cs: Láhve do chladičů vody
da: Vandkøler – flasker
de: Flaschen für Wasserspender
es: Botellas para refrigeradores de agua
fr: Bouteilles pour fontaines à eau
it: Bottiglie per raffreddare l'acqua
ja: ウォータークーラー用ボトル
nl: Waterkoelerflessen
no: Vannkjølerflasker
pl: Butelki do dystrybutorów wody
pt: Galões para bebedouros
ru: Бутыли для кулеров для воды
sv: Flaskor till vattenkylare
tr: Su Soğutucu Şişeleri

en: Wine Fridge Accessories
xx: Wine Fridge Accessories
cs: Příslušenstvím k vinotékám
da: Tilbehør til vinkøleskabe
de: Weinkühlschrank-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para neveras de vinos
fr: Accessoires pour armoires à vin
it: Accessori per frigoriferi dei vini
ja: ワインセラー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor wijnkoelkasten
no: Tilbehør til vinkjøleskap
pl: Akcesoria do chłodziarek do wina
pt: Acessórios para adegas climatizadas
ru: Принадлежности для холодильников для вина
sv: Vinkylstillbehör
tr: Şarap Dolabı Aksesuarları

en: Yogurt Maker Accessories
xx: Yogurt Maker Accessories
cs: Jogurtovače – příslušenství
da: Yoghurtmaskine – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Joghurtmaschinen
es: Accesorios para yogurteras
fr: Accessoires pour yaourtières
it: Accessori per yogurt
ja: ヨーグルトメーカー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor yoghurtmakers
no: Tilbehør til yoghurtmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do maszynek do jogurtu
pt: Acessórios para máquinas de fazer iogurte
ru: Принадлежности для йогуртниц
sv: Tillbehör till yogurtmaskiner
tr: Yoğurt Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Kitchen Appliances
xx: Kitchen Appliances
cs: Kuchyňské spotřebiče
da: Køkkenudstyr
de: Küchengeräte
es: Electrodomésticos de cocina
fr: Électroménager de cuisine
it: Elettrodomestici
ja: キッチン家電
nl: Keukenmachines
no: Kjøkkenapparater
pl: Akcesoria kuchenne
pt: Utensílios para cozinha
ru: Кухонная техника
sv: Köksutrustning
tr: Mutfak Aletleri

en: Beverage Warmers
xx: Beverage Warmers
cs: Ohřívače nápojů
da: Varmeplader til drikkevarer
de: Getränkewärmer
es: Calentadores de bebidas
fr: Chauffe tasses
it: Scaldabevande
ja: ドリンクウォーマー
nl: Drankenwarmers
no: Drikkevarmere
pl: Podgrzewacze do napojów
pt: Aquecedores de bebidas
ru: Подогреватели для напитков
sv: Dryckvärmare
tr: İçecek Isıtıcıları

en: Breadmakers, Bread Makers
xx: Breadmakers
cs: Domácí pekárny
da: Brødmaskiner
de: Brotbackautomaten
es: Horno de pan
fr: Machines à pain, Machine à pain
it: Macchine per fare il pane
ja: ホームベーカリー
nl: Broodmachines
no: Brødbakemaskiner
pl: Maszynki do chleba
pt: Panificadoras
ru: Хлебопечки
sv: Bakmaskiner
tr: Ekmek Yapma Makineleri

en: Chocolate Tempering Machines
xx: Chocolate Tempering Machines
cs: Přístroje na temperování čokolády
da: Chokoladesmeltere
de: Temperiermaschinen für Schokolade
es: Máquinas para derretir chocolate
fr: Tempéreuses à chocolat
it: Macchine temperatrici cioccolato
ja: チョコレートテンパリングマシン
nl: Tempereermachines voor chocolade
no: Sjokoladetempereringsmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do temperingu czekolady
pt: Máquinas para temperar chocolate
ru: Темперирующие машины для шоколада
sv: Maskiner för chokladtemperering
tr: Çikolata Sertleştirme Makineleri

en: Coffee Makers & Espresso Machines
xx: Coffee Makers & Espresso Machines
cs: Kávovary a automaty na espreso
da: Kaffemaskiner og espressomaskiner
de: Kaffee- & Espressomaschinen
es: Cafeteras
fr: Machines à café et machines à expresso, Machine à café
it: Macchine caffè ed espresso
ja: コーヒーメーカー・エスプレッソマシン
nl: Koffiezetapparaten en espressomachines
no: Kaffetraktere og espressomaskiner
pl: Ekspresy do kawy i espresso
pt: Cafeteiras e máquinas de café expresso
ru: Кофеварки и эспрессо-машины
sv: Kaffebryggare och espressomaskiner
tr: Kahve Makineleri ve Espresso Makineleri

en: Drip Coffee Makers
xx: Drip Coffee Makers
cs: Překapávací kávovary
da: Kaffemaskiner
de: Filterkaffeemaschinen
es: Cafeteras de filtro
fr: Cafetières filtres
it: Macchine per caffè americano
ja: コーヒーメーカー
nl: Koffiezetapparaten
no: Kaffetraktere
pl: Przelewowe ekspresy do kawy
pt: Cafeteiras
ru: Капельные кофемашины
sv: Kaffebryggare
tr: Filtre Kahve Makineleri

en: Electric & Stovetop Espresso Pots
xx: Electric & Stovetop Espresso Pots
cs: Moka konvice
da: Espressokander – elektriske og til komfur
de: Espressokannen
es: Cafeteras italianas tradicionales y eléctricas
fr: Cafetières italiennes
it: Caffettiera elettriche e da fornello
ja: 電気式・直火式マキネッタ
nl: Espressomachines en -potjes
no: Espressokanner for elektriske plater og kokeplater
pl: Kawiarki
pt: Cafeteiras italianas
ru: Электрические и ручные кофеварки эспрессо
sv: Elektriska espressobryggare och espressobryggare för spisen
tr: Elektrikli ve Ocak Üstü Espresso Cezveleri

en: Espresso Machines
xx: Espresso Machines
cs: Automaty na espreso
da: Espressomaskiner
de: Espressomaschinen
es: Máquinas de expreso
fr: Machines à expresso
it: Macchine per espresso
ja: エスプレッソマシン
nl: Espressoapparaten
no: Espressomaskiner
pl: Ekspresy do espresso
pt: Máquinas de café expresso
ru: Эспрессо-машины
sv: Espressomaskiner
tr: Espresso Makineleri

en: French Presses
xx: French Presses
cs: Francouzské kávovary
da: Filterkaffekander
de: Pressstempelkannen
es: Cafeteras de émbolo
fr: Cafetières à piston
it: Caffettiere francesi
ja: フレンチプレス
nl: Cafetière
no: Presskanner
pl: Zaparzacze do kawy
pt: Prensas francesas de café
ru: Френч-прессы
sv: Pressobryggare
tr: Kahve Demleme Aparatları